Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 9 Dismissal of Conservator

29-5-80.
Petition for dismissal of conservator; final return; notice; order dismissing conservator.

Upon the termination of the conservatorship or the resignation of the conservator, the conservator may petition the court for an order dismissing the conservator from office. The petition shall include a final return to the court which covers the period from the latest annual return filed by the conservator. The final return shall contain the information required for annual returns and shall otherwise comply with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-60. Notice shall be published one time in the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county in which the petition is filed and shall state that any objection must be made in writing and shall designate the date on or before which objections must be filed in the court, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of publication. The court shall examine any objections filed.

If no objection is filed or if, upon hearing any objection, the court is satisfied that the order dismissing the conservator from office is appropriate, the court shall enter an order dismissing the conservator from office. Such order shall not bar an action against the conservator or the conservator’s surety.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “less than 30 days” was substituted for “less then 30 days” in the fourth sentence in subsection (a).

29-5-81.
Final settlement; appearance by ward or successor conservator; return of property.

A ward who has been restored to capacity, the personal representative of a deceased ward, a successor conservator, or any interested person may petition the court for an order requiring a conservator or that conservator’s personal representative to appear and submit to a final settlement of the conservator’s accounts. Alternatively, the court on its own motion may issue such an order. The settlement period shall begin from the commencement of the conservatorship or the end of the period covered by the last interim settlement of accounts. If the conservator fails or refuses to appear as cited, the court may proceed without the appearance of the conservator. If the conservator has been required to give bond, the surety on the bond shall be bound by the settlement if the surety is given notice by first-class mail of the settlement proceeding.

A conservator, a former conservator, the conservator of a conservator, or the personal representative of a deceased conservator shall be allowed to cite the ward, the ward’s personal representative, or a successor conservator to appear and be present at a final settlement of the conservator’s accounts and discharge from liability in the manner provided in this Code section. The settlement period shall begin with the period of time from the commencement of the conservatorship or the end of the period covered by the last interim settlement of accounts. Notice by first-class mail of the settlement proceeding must be given to the surety on the conservator’s bond and to the ward’s guardian, if any. If the ward has not been restored to capacity or if the conservator is the ward’s personal representative, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the ward who shall be served personally.

Upon the return of a notice referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, the court shall proceed to examine all returns and accounts of the conservator during the settlement period and to hear any objection to the settlement and discharge.

The court shall order any property in the hands of the conservator to be delivered to the ward, the ward’s personal representative, or to the successor conservator and shall issue a judgment, writ of fieri facias, and execution thereon for any sums found to be due from the conservator. If the court is satisfied that the conservator has faithfully and honestly discharged the office, an order shall be entered releasing and discharging the conservator from all liability.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.